Hawaii statutes.
§11-173.5 Contests for cause in primary,
special primary elections, and county elections held concurrently with a
regularly scheduled primary or special primary election. (a) In primary
and special primary election contests, and county election contests held
concurrently with a regularly scheduled primary or special primary election,
the complaint shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the supreme court
not later than 4:30 p.m. on the sixth day after a primary or special primary
election, or county election contests held concurrently with a regularly
scheduled primary or special primary election, and shall be accompanied by a
deposit for costs of court as established by rules of the supreme court. The
clerk shall issue to the defendants named in the complaint a summons to appear
before the supreme court not later than 4:30 p.m. on the fifth day after
service thereof.

(b) In primary and special primary election
contests, and county election contests held concurrently with a regularly
scheduled primary or special primary election, the court shall hear the contest
in a summary manner and at the hearing the court shall cause the evidence to be
reduced to writing and shall not later than 4:30 p.m. on the fourth day after
the return give judgment fully stating all findings of fact and of law. The
judgment shall decide what candidate was nominated or elected, as the case may
be, in the manner presented by the petition, and a certified copy of the
judgment shall forthwith be served on the chief election officer or the county
clerk, as the case may be, who shall place the name of the candidate declared
to be nominated on the ballot for the forthcoming general, special general, or
runoff election. The judgment shall be conclusive of the right of the candidate
so declared to be nominated; provided that this subsection shall not operate to
amend or repeal section 12-41. [L 1973, c 217, §1(aaa); am L 1974, c 34, §1(c);
am L 1979, c 133, §5; am L 1998, c 22, §2]

Rules of Court

Collection of costs and fees by appellate clerk, see HRAP
rule 45(e).

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next